Missouri, session 2026, HB3060.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 190, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 190.086, to read as follows:
190.086. 1. Notwithstanding provisions of sections 190.001 to 190.245 to the
contrary, any hospital organized under chapter 96, 205, or 206 that operates a licensed
ambulance service under the provisions of sections 190.001 to 190.245 may petition to
establish an ambulance district within its political boundaries by an act of its duly
elected board of trustees. Such petition shall be filed by the board in the office of the
county clerk of the county in which the hospital is located, in lieu of public petition, in a
manner otherwise consistent with the provisions of section 190.015.
2. After the ambulance district has been declared organized, the hospital board
of trustees shall serve as the ambulance district board of directors. The terms and
qualifications of the ambulance district board of directors shall follow the same for the
hospital board of trustees under chapters 96, 205, and 206, as applicable.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.